Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 1

State Historian and Historical Commission

4-11-101. State historian.

There is hereby created the position of state historian.

The governor shall appoint some person qualified by experience and training to this position.

The term of office of such historian shall be for four (4) years from the date of such historian's appointment and until such historian's successor shall be appointed and qualified.

Subsequent appointments as the terms expire shall be made by the governor.

The department of finance and administration shall furnish the state historian suitable office space in some state office building.

The office of state historian shall be honorary, and the incumbent shall receive no compensation therefor, except that the incumbent shall be reimbursed for necessary traveling expenses incurred while in the performance of official duties, which shall be certified to and paid in the manner prescribed for other state officials.

It is the state historian's duty to prepare for publication and to disseminate historical data upon Tennessee history, present and past, and to conduct such negotiations for the publication thereof in book form as may be deemed proper. However, no publication in book form shall be made without proper authorization from the governor.

Acts 1955, ch. 130, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; T.C.A., § 4-1109; Acts 1971, ch. 349, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-1101.

Cross-References. Demolition of historic structures, title 7, ch. 51, part 12.

4-11-102. Commission — Creation — Membership.

There is hereby created the Tennessee historical commission, which shall be composed of the governor or the governor's designee, the state historian, the state archaeologist, the commissioner of environment and conservation or the commissioner's designee, and the state librarian and archivist, all of whom shall be voting ex officio members; and twenty-four (24) members appointed by the governor. In making appointments to the commission, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person serving on the commission is sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least one (1) person serving on the commission is a member of a racial minority. At least three (3) persons serving on the commission shall have an academic background in history or historic preservation, or both, preferably a master's degree. In making the appointments, there should be a conscientious effort by the appointing authority to ensure that persons meeting these criteria are inclusive of African-Americans and of Native American ancestry.

In case of death or resignation of any appointed member of the commission, then such member's successor shall be appointed by the governor for a term of five (5) years from the date of the successor's appointment.

Members of the commission appointed pursuant to this section shall be equally divided among the three (3) grand divisions of the state.

Members who have been granted the title “member emeritus” by an action of the commission shall retain the same rights and privileges of other members, except the right to vote at meetings of the commission.

All members of the commission may be paid necessary expenses while engaged in the work of the commission. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1969, ch. 98, § 1; modified; T.C.A., § 4-1110; Acts 1971, ch. 227, § 1; 1971, ch. 349, § 2; 1973, ch. 19, § 2; 1976, ch. 399, § 1; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(25); 1977, ch. 8, § 2; T.C.A., § 4-1102; Acts 1988, ch. 1013, § 4; 1998, ch. 1064, § 1; 2014, ch. 624, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The commission is attached to the department of environment and conservation for administrative purposes. See §11-1-101.

This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

The Tennessee historical commission, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2025. See §§4-29-112,4-29-246.

Acts 1998, ch. 1064, which added the last sentence in (a), provided in § 2 that the provisions of that act do not apply to any member of the commission on May 19, 1998, for the duration of such member's current term.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Tennessee historical commission designated to be the Tennessee wars commission, §4-11-303.

Attorney General Opinions. Rights and privileges of ex officio commission members, OAG 98-0114, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 114 (6/23/98).

4-11-103. Commission — Administration of funds — Reports.

The commission shall adopt rules for the transaction of business and shall keep a record of all its proceedings.

It shall:

Prepare such reports of its operation as may be required by the governor or the general assembly;

Administer funds made available from public sources for historical purposes;

Submit a budget consistent with its program; and

Operate its program within the financial resources available.

The commission shall exercise administrative supervision over all funds appropriated for the purposes of this part, and no allotment of funds may be made without the review of the commission.

The commission shall require proper financial and accounting statements from all recipients of funds authorized under this part on or before June 30 of each year, and all recipients shall comply with the standard operating procedures of the commission.

Acts 1969, ch. 98, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 4-1111, 4-1103.

Compiler's Notes. The commission is attached to the department of environment and conservation for administrative purposes. See §11-1-101.

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. §4-11-103(b)(2) is sufficiently broad to authorize the Tennessee Historical Commission to pay for the publication of magazines or journals of private organizations related to Tennessee history, which circulate exclusively to the members of those organizations, given such publications concern “historical purposes.” OAG 12-53, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 53 (5/21/2012).

4-11-104. Criteria for evaluation of historic sites.

The commission shall develop criteria for the evaluation of state historic sites and all related real and personal property that may be of such importance as would justify acquisition and ownership by this state, and it shall also develop criteria for evaluation of any such properties owned by agencies other than the state for which state aid is requested.

Acts 1969, ch. 98, § 3; T.C.A., §§ 4-1112, 4-1104.

4-11-105. Commission personnel.

In order to effectively carry on its program, the commission has the authority to create such positions and employ such personnel as are deemed necessary to conduct its affairs in accordance with the law and rules applicable to employees in the unclassified state service.

All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1969, ch. 98, § 4; T.C.A., § 4-1113; Acts 1976, ch. 806, § 1(25); T.C.A., § 4-1105.

4-11-106. Commission — Advisory boards or committees.

The commission may also establish and appoint one (1) or more advisory boards or advisory committees to assist the commission in the performance of its duties.

The commission shall establish a historic cemetery advisory committee composed of seven (7) members. The committee may include up to three (3) members of the commission and must include at least one (1) non-commission member with expertise in each of the following areas: archeology, cemetery or land law, and historic preservation. The commission shall strive to ensure that the membership of the committee appropriately reflects the racial and geographic diversity of the state. The committee shall study protections and preservation efforts for cemeteries of historical importance and the need, if any, to enhance protections and preservation efforts. By December 1, 2020, and every five (5) years thereafter, the committee shall issue a report, including any recommendations for legislative action, to the commission. The commission may adopt the report or return the report to the committee for further consideration. If adopted by the commission, the report shall be posted on the website of the commission.

The commission is authorized, out of any funds appropriated to the commission, to pay the actual expenses of such board or committee members incurred while on official business.

All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1969, ch. 98, § 7; T.C.A., § 4-1116; Acts 1976, ch. 806, § 1(25); T.C.A., § 4-1106; Acts 2018, ch. 1032, § 2.

4-11-107. Acquisition of historical or archaeological property.

The commission may accept gifts, bequests and endowments from any private source, and may acquire real and personal properties that have statewide historical or archaeological significance by gift, purchase, devise or bequest, the title thereto to vest in the state.

Acts 1969, ch. 98, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 4-1114, 4-1107.

4-11-108. Operation of historical property.

The historical properties owned by the state shall be placed under the authority of the commission, which may in its discretion make a contract with any county, municipality or agency within the state or with any nonprofit corporation or organization or with any private individual, partnership, corporation or association for the administration, development or operation of such property, which contract shall be subject to periodic review.

Any such contract made by the commission shall be expressly subject to the requirements of the public purchasing law, title 12, chapter 3.

The commission shall determine criteria for the approval of such properties for state aid, and shall make reasonable rules for the regulation of use by the public of such historical properties under its charge, including the establishment of admission fees to be charged the public.

The commission, under this chapter, may contract for the preservation, maintenance and operation of the Sam Houston Schoolhouse State Historic Site.

The commission, under the authority of this chapter, shall enter into a suitable contract for the maintenance, preservation and interpretation of the John Sevier Home Historic Site.

Acts 1969, ch. 98, § 6; T.C.A., § 4-1115; Acts 1974, ch. 559, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 143, § 1; Acts 1979, ch. 108, § 2; 1979, ch. 126, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-1108.

Cross-References. Review prior to demolishing, altering or transferring historically, architecturally or culturally significant state property, §4-11-111.

4-11-109. Preservation of public records — Certified copies.

Any state, county, town or other public official in custody of public documents is empowered in such official's discretion to turn over to the commission any official books, documents, records, official papers, newspaper files, printed books or portraits not in current use in the public official's office, and the commission shall provide for their permanent preservation.

When so surrendered, copies of the items mentioned in subsection (a) shall be made and certified under seal, upon application of any person, which certificate shall have effect as if made by the officer originally in charge of them, and the commission shall charge for such copies the same fees as that officer is by the law allowed.

Acts 1921, ch. 74, § 8; Shan. Supp., § 2577a24; mod. Code 1932, T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-1107; T.C.A., § 4-1109.

4-11-110. Appropriations.

For carrying out the purposes and objects of this chapter, the sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or so much thereof as shall be needed, over and above all the funds derived from the sale of the publications and all of the fees collected under §4-11-109, is annually or continuously appropriated, and, upon order of the chair of the commission, the commissioner of finance and administration is empowered and directed to draw the commissioner's warrant for the sum from the state treasury.

Acts 1921, ch. 74, § 9; Shan. Supp., § 2577a25; mod. Code 1932, § 1024; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, §§ 15, 24; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-1108; T.C.A., § 4-1110.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

4-11-111. Review prior to demolishing, altering or transferring historically, architecturally or culturally significant state property.

All state agencies and institutions of higher education and other state entities that have control of state property shall consult the commission prior to demolishing, altering or transferring any property that is or may be of historical, architectural or cultural significance. Such agencies, institutions and entities shall seek the advice of the commission on possible alternatives to the demolition, alteration or transfer of such property.

The commission shall make staff available to assist agencies, institutions and entities in determining if property is or may be of historical, architectural or cultural significance.

The commission shall have thirty (30) working days to review and comment on plans to demolish, alter or transfer state property that is or may be of historical, architectural or cultural significance prior to approval of such action by the state building commission. Such comment shall be in writing and filed with the proposing agency or entity and the state building commission.

The standard of review by the historical commission shall be the secretary of the interior's standards of rehabilitation or other criteria adopted in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title.

The state building commission shall consider the comments of the historical commission prior to approving or disapproving plans to demolish, alter or transfer state property that is or may be of historical, architectural or cultural significance.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as further extending the jurisdiction of the state building commission over transactions involving department of transportation projects. When the department is the proposing agency, the commissioner of transportation shall consider the comments of the historical commission prior to demolishing, altering or transferring state property that is of historical, architectural or cultural significance.

Acts 1988, ch. 699, § 1.

4-11-112. Site preservation fund.

There is created a special account in the state treasury to be known as the Tennessee Civil War or War Between the States site preservation fund, hereinafter referred to as the “preservation fund”.

Moneys in the preservation fund shall be used exclusively by the Tennessee historical commission to provide grants to private nonprofit organizations to match federal and other matching funds. All such grants shall be made solely for the fee simple purchase of, or purchase of protective interests in, any Tennessee Civil War or War Between the States historic site listed in the Report on the Nation's Civil War Battlefields, issued in 1993, or as amended or reissued pursuant to the Civil War Battlefield Preservation Act of 2002 (P.L. 107-359)(16 U.S.C. § 469k), as amended or supplemented by new information by the national park service's American battlefield protection program, hereinafter referred to as “the report” or any historic site associated with the Underground Railroad that is eligible for national historic landmark designation or for listing in the national register of historic places.

The commission shall establish, administer, manage and make expenditures and allocations from the preservation fund.

Private nonprofit organizations seeking grant funding from the preservation fund shall be required to provide matching funds from any nonstate sources on a dollar-for-dollar basis.

For the purposes of this section, “matching funds” means both cash and the value of any noncash contribution due to a bargain sale or the donation of land or interest therein made by the landowner as part of the proposed project.

No state funds may be included in determining the amount of the match.

Eligible costs for which moneys from the preservation fund may be allocated include acquisition of land and any improvements thereon or permanent protective interests, including, but not limited to, conservation easements, and costs associated with such acquisitions, including, but not limited to, the cost of appraisals, environmental reports, surveys, title searches and title insurance, and other closing costs.

Grants from the preservation fund shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the appraised value of the land or permanent protective interest therein.

Grants from the preservation fund may be awarded for prospective purchases or for acquisitions which the applicant has closed; provided, that for closed acquisitions, the applicant shall demonstrate that:

The closing occurred no more than twelve (12) months prior to the date of application for the grant; and

An identifiable threat to the resource or compelling need for preservation existed at the time of the purchase.

Any eligible organization making an acquisition of land or interest therein pursuant to this section shall grant to the state or other qualified holder a perpetual easement placing restrictions on the use or development of the land. In cases where the easement is granted to a holder other than the state, all terms and conditions of the easement shall be reviewed by and found by the commission to be consistent with the intent and purpose of the Conservation Easement Act, compiled in title 66, chapter 9, part 3, and to accomplish the perpetual preservation of Civil War or War Between the States historic site or historic site associated with the Underground Railroad. Such other holder shall demonstrate to the commission that it has the capacity and expertise to manage and enforce the terms of the easement.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the subsequent transfer of property acquired pursuant to this section to the United States, its agencies or instrumentalities.

The commission shall establish, administer, manage and make expenditures and allocations from the preservation fund and shall establish guidelines for applications, prioritization and award of grants from the preservation fund in consultation with appropriate site preservation interests. Consideration shall be given, but not limited to, the following:

Significance of the battlefield and the location of the proposed project in relation to core and study areas as identified in the report as well as proximity to other protected lands;

Threat to and integrity of the features associated with the battle which occurred there; and

The financial and administrative capacity of the applicant to complete the project and to maintain and manage the property consistent with the public investment and public interests, such as education, recreation, research, heritage tourism promotion or orderly community development.

All grant recipients are subject to audit by the comptroller of the treasury as to the funds received pursuant to this section.

In addition to appropriations made to the preservation fund, the commission may accept other funds, public or private, by way of gift or grant to the fund. Any such gift or grant shall be deposited into the preservation fund to be distributed in accordance with this section.

Moneys in the preservation fund may be invested by the state treasurer in accordance with § 9-4-602.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, interest accruing on investments and deposits of the preservation fund shall be credited to such fund, shall not revert to the general fund, and shall be carried forward into the subsequent fiscal year.

Any balance remaining unexpended at the end of a fiscal year in the preservation fund shall not revert to the general fund but shall be carried forward into the subsequent fiscal year.

Acts 2013, ch. 248, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. The Civil War Battlefield Preservation Act of 2002 (P.L. 107-359), codified in 16 USC § 469k, was repealed by its own terms effective September 30, 2008 (see 16 U.S.C.§ 469k(e)).

Acts 2013, ch. 248, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Civil War or War Between the States Site Preservation Act of 2013.”

4-11-113. Historic property land acquisition fund.

There is hereby created a special agency account in the state general fund known as the historic property land acquisition fund. Expenditures from such fund shall be made only to implement and carry out the purposes set forth in subsection (b). Funds deposited in such fund shall not revert at the end of any fiscal year, and all interest accruing on investments and deposits of the fund not otherwise expended shall be returned to and made a part of the fund.

The historical commission shall expend the funds which are deposited in the historic property land acquisition fund only for the acquisition of land for any area designated as an historic place as evidenced by its inclusion on the national register of historic places or the Tennessee register of historic places, or any other area of historic significance as approved by majority vote of the entire membership of the commission, and for the acquisition of easements to protect the historic areas. Such funds may also be used for capital projects, including improvements and maintenance, of properties previously acquired, and for capital grants to other historic properties not owned or operated by the state.

No funds deposited in the historic property land acquisition fund shall be obligated or expended to acquire any interest in real property through condemnation or the power of eminent domain.

Acts 2016, ch. 1059, § 2.